Utah statutes.
62A-4a-106.   Services provided by division.
(1)  The division may provide, directly or through contract, services that
include the following:
(a)  adoptions;
(b)  day care for children;
(c)  out-of-home placements for minors;
(d)  health-related services;
(e)  homemaking services;
(f)  home management services;
(g)  protective services for minors;
(h)  transportation services; and
(i)  domestic violence services.
(2)  Services provided directly by the division or through contract shall be
monitored by the division to insure compliance with applicable:
(a)  state law; and
(b)  standards and rules of the division.
